Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-610
Local charters; right to adopt.

Nothing in sections 19-601 to 19-648 shall be construed to interfere with or prevent any city at any time from framing and adopting a charter for its own government as provided by the state Constitution. In exercising the right to frame its own charter, it shall not be obligatory upon any city to adopt or retain any of the provisions of sections 19-601 to 19-648.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 11, p. 500;

C.S.1922, § 4548;

C.S.1929, § 19-611;

R.S.1943, § 19-610.